Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-978.01
Class V School Employees Retirement Act, how cited.

Sections 79-978 to 79-9,124 shall be known and may be cited as the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 1998, LB 497, § 7;

Laws 2011, LB509, § 33;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 15;

Laws 2017, LB415, § 35;

Laws 2019, LB31, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB34, § 17;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 8;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 26.
July 18, 2026